Maryland, session 2025, HB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Banking institution” means an institution that is incorporated under the
laws of this State as a State bank, trust company, or savings bank.
(e) “Charter” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the Corporations and
Associations Article.
(g) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Regulation in the
Maryland Department of Labor.
(i) “Credit union” means a credit union that is incorporated under the laws of this
State as a credit union.
SUBTITLE 5. COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN.

HOUSE BILL 1040 3
1–501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “APPLICATION FOR A DEPOSIT FACILITY OR LICENSE” MEANS AN
APPLICATION TO THE COMMISSIONER FOR:
(1) A CHARTER FOR A BANKING INSTITUTION OR A CREDIT UNION;
(2) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A DOMESTIC BRANCH OR OTHER
FACILITY WITH THE ABILITY TO ACCEPT DEPOSITS FOR A REGULATED FINANCIAL
INSTITUTION;
(3) THE RELOCATION OF THE HOME OFFICE OR A BRANCH OFFICE OF
A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION;
(4) THE MERGER OR CONSOLIDATION WITH, OR THE ACQUISITION OF
THE ASSETS, OR THE ASSUMPTION OF THE LIABILITIES OF A REGULATED FINANCIAL
INSTITUTION;
(5) THE ACQUISITION OF SHARES IN, OR THE ASSETS OF, A
REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION REQUIRING APPROVAL UNDER STATE LAW; OR
(6) AN INITIAL LICENSE OR RENEWAL LICENSE TO MAKE LOANS OR
TO OFFER OTHER FINANCIAL SERVICES.
(C) “COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN” MEANS A PLAN CREATED BY A
REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT:
(1) PROVIDES MEASURABLE AND VERIFIABLE GOALS FOR FUTURE
AMOUNTS OF SAFE AND SOUND LOANS, INVESTMENTS, GRANTS, SERVICES, AND
OTHER FINANCIAL PRODUCTS FOR LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME INDIVIDUALS
AND COMMUNITIES AND OTHER DISTRESSED OR UNDERSERVED INDIVIDUALS AND
COMMUNITIES;
(2) HAS GOALS THAT ARE DEVELOPED IN REFERENCE TO PAST
LEVELS OF LENDING, INVESTMENTS, GRANTS, AND SERVICES;
(3) INCLUDES COMPARISONS TO DEMOGRAPHIC BENCHMARKS AND
PEER OR INDUSTRY LEVELS OF ACTIVITIES; AND

HOUSE BILL 1040
(4) INCLUDES DOCUMENTATION OF INPUT FROM COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATIONS AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS.
(D) “COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT” INCLUDES:
(1) AFFORDABLE HOUSING FOR LOW– OR MODERATE–INCOME
INDIVIDUALS;
(2) AVOIDANCE OF PATTERNS OF LENDING RESULTING IN THE LOSS
OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS;
(3) COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT SERVICES, INCLUDING COUNSELING
AND SUCCESSFUL MORTGAGE OR LOAN MODIFICATIONS OF DELINQUENT LOANS;
(4) ACTIVITIES THAT PROMOTE:
(I) INTEGRATION;
(II) CLIMATE REMEDIATION AND DISASTER PREPAREDNESS;
(III) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BY FINANCING SMALL
BUSINESSES OR FARMS THAT MEET THE SIZE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS OF THE
DEVELOPMENT COMPANY OR SMALL BUSINESS INVESTMENT COMPANY PROGRAMS
UNDER 13 C.F.R. § 121.301, OR ANY SUCCESSOR REGULATION, WITH AN EMPHASIS
ON SMALL BUSINESSES THAT HAVE GROSS ANNUAL REVENUES OF NOT MORE THAN
$1,000,000; OR
(IV) PHYSICAL AND SENSORY ACCESSIBILITY IN HOUSING
STOCK THAT IS INTEGRATED INTO THE COMMUNITY;
(5) ACTIVITIES THAT REVITALIZE OR STABILIZE:
(I) LOW– OR MODERATE–INCOME GEOGRAPHIC AREAS;
(II) DESIGNATED DISASTER AREAS;
(III) OTHER DISTRESSED OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES; OR
(IV) DISTRESSED OR UNDERSERVED NONMETROPOLITAN
MIDDLE–INCOME GEOGRAPHIC AREAS OR OTHER GEOGRAPHIC AREAS DESIGNATED
BY THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS EXAMINATION COUNCIL; AND

HOUSE BILL 1040 5
(6) OTHER ACTIVITIES THAT PROMOTE THE OBJECTIVES OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AS DETERMINED BY THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THE FEDERAL
COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT ACT OR BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(E) “OTHER DISTRESSED OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” MEANS A
COUNTY, CENSUS TRACT, OR OTHER AREA THAT, ACCORDING TO A PERIODIC
REVIEW AND DATA ANALYSIS BY THE COMMISSIONER OR THE APPROPRIATE
FEDERAL FINANCIAL SUPERVISORY AGENCIES ON AN INTERAGENCY BASIS
THROUGH THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS EXAMINATION COUNCIL, IS
EXPERIENCING ECONOMIC HARDSHIP OR IS UNDERSERVED BY FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS, INCLUDING BY HAVING A LOW LEVEL OF LOANS PER HOUSEHOLD OR
PER SMALL BUSINESS.
(F) “OTHER UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS” MEANS A POPULATION THAT
EXPERIENCES ONGOING EFFECTS OF DISCRIMINATION OR IS RELATIVELY
UNDERSERVED BY FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS AS MEASURED BY LOANS PER CAPITA
OR OTHER SIMILAR METRICS.
(G) “REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION” MEANS:
(1) A BANKING INSTITUTION AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) A CREDIT UNION AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(3) A NONDEPOSITORY MORTGAGE COMPANY.
1–502.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO
DEMONSTRATE THAT IT SERVES THE CONVENIENCE AND NEEDS OF THE
COMMUNITIES WHERE THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION IS CHARTERED TO
DO BUSINESS;
(2) THE CONVENIENCE AND NEEDS OF COMMUNITIES INCLUDE THE
NEED FOR CREDIT, DEPOSIT SERVICES, AND OTHER FINANCIAL PRODUCTS;
(3) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION HAS A CONTINUING AND
AFFIRMATIVE OBLIGATION TO SERVE COMMUNITY NEEDS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1040
(4) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION MUST DEMONSTRATE
RESPONSIVENESS TO COMMUNITY NEEDS BY DEVELOPING A COMMUNITY BENEFITS
PLAN WHEN SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR A DEPOSIT FACILITY OR LICENSE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBTITLE IS TO REQUIRE THE COMMISSIONER
TO ENCOURAGE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS TO MEET THE FINANCIAL
NEEDS OF THE LOCAL COMMUNITIES WHERE THE REGULATED FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARE CHARTERED CONSISTENT WITH THE SAFE AND SOUND
OPERATION OF THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS.
1–503.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONTRACT WITH QUALIFIED PERSONS TO
CONDUCT A DISPARITY STUDY TO IDENTIFY UNDERSERVED COUNTIES,
POPULATIONS, AND CENSUS TRACTS IN THE STATE.
(B) THE DISPARITY STUDY SHALL IDENTIFY SEGMENTS OF THE
POPULATION THAT ARE UNDERSERVED DUE TO DISCRIMINATION BY
METROPOLITAN AREA AND BY URBAN AND RURAL COUNTIES.
(C) THE DISPARITY STUDY SHALL BE:
(1) COMPLETED ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025;
(2) UPDATED ONCE EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER; AND
(3) MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
1–504.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A NONDEPOSITORY MORTGAGE
COMPANY THAT ISSUES FEWER THAN 50 SINGLE–FAMILY HOME LOANS ON AN
ANNUAL BASIS.
(B) (1) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION SHALL DEVELOP A
COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN IN CONNECTION WITH AN APPLICATION FOR A DEPOSIT
FACILITY OR LICENSE.
(2) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN SHALL:
(I) HAVE A DURATION OF 3 YEARS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1040 7
(II) INCLUDE GOALS ESTABLISHED FOR EACH YEAR FOR RETAIL
LENDING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT LENDING, INVESTMENT,
GRANTMAKING, AND SERVICES.
(3) ON THE EXPIRATION OF A COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN, A
REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION SHALL ADOPT A NEW COMMUNITY BENEFIT
PLAN.
(4) (I) BEFORE ADOPTING A COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN, A
REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION SHALL SUBMIT A DRAFT OF THE PLAN TO THE
COMMISSIONER.
(II) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ESTABLISH A PUBLIC
COMMENT PERIOD OF NOT LESS THAN 60 DAYS DURING WHICH MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC MAY PROVIDE COMMENTS ON THE DRAFT COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN.
(III) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION SHALL REVISE THE
DRAFT COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN IN RESPONSE TO PUBLIC COMMENTS ON THE
PLAN.
(IV) THE COMMISSIONER MAY REQUIRE A REGULATED
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION TO REVISE A DRAFT COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN IN
RESPONSE TO PUBLIC COMMENTS ON THE PLAN.
(5) (I) WHEN RENEWING A LICENSE DURING A YEAR WHEN A
COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN IS IN EFFECT, A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER AND MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC A
REPORT ON COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN GOAL ATTAINMENT THAT:
1. IDENTIFIES ANY GOALS THE REGULATED FINANCIAL
INSTITUTION DID NOT MEET; AND
2. INCLUDES VERIFIABLE DATA.
(II) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL RECEIVE PUBLIC COMMENTS
ON THE REPORT DURING A PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(C) (1) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT ISSUES AT LEAST
300 BUT FEWER THAN 1,000 SINGLE–FAMILY HOME LOANS EACH YEAR SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1040
(I) INCLUDE IN ITS COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN A RETAIL
LENDING PRODUCT OR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT LOANS, INVESTMENTS, GRANTS,
OR SERVICES THAT ARE TARGETED TO:
1. AT LEAST ONE UNDERSERVED OR DISTRESSED
COUNTY; AND
2. LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME INDIVIDUALS AND
OTHER UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS IN THAT COUNTY; AND
(II) FOR EACH PLAN YEAR, SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER AND
MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC VERIFIABLE DATA THAT INCLUDES:
1. DEMOGRAPHIC INFORMATION ON RETAIL LENDING
RECIPIENTS AND THE NUMBER OF LOANS MADE TO TARGET POPULATIONS; AND
2. DATA REGARDING COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
LOANS, INVESTMENTS, GRANTS, AND SERVICES.
(2) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT ISSUES 1,000 OR
MORE SINGLE–FAMILY LOANS EACH YEAR SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE IN ITS COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN A RETAIL
LENDING PRODUCT OR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT LOANS, INVESTMENTS, GRANTS,
OR SERVICES THAT ARE TARGETED TO:
1. AT LEAST TWO UNDERSERVED OR DISTRESSED
COUNTIES;
2. ONE OR MORE UNDERSERVED OR DISTRESSED
CENSUS TRACTS; AND
3. LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME INDIVIDUALS AND
OTHER UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS IN THE COUNTIES AND CENSUS TRACTS; AND
(II) FOR EACH PLAN YEAR, SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER AND
MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC VERIFIABLE DATA THAT INCLUDES:
1. DEMOGRAPHIC INFORMATION ON RETAIL LENDING
RECIPIENTS AND THE NUMBER OF LOANS MADE TO TARGET POPULATIONS; AND
2. DATA REGARDING COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
LOANS, INVESTMENTS, GRANTS, AND SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 1040 9
(D) A BANKING INSTITUTION OR A CREDIT UNION SHALL DESCRIBE IN A
COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN, IN CONNECTION WITH THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
DOMESTIC BRANCH OR BRANCH RELOCATION, HOW THE NEW OR RELOCATED
BRANCH WILL BENEFIT LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME CENSUS TRACTS OR
PREDOMINANTLY MINORITY TRACTS IN PROXIMITY TO THE BRANCH.
(E) (1) A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC MAY COMMENT AT ANY TIME ON THE
COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN OF A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION.
(2) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION AND THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL RETAIN COPIES OF PUBLIC COMMENTS RECEIVED ON A COMMUNITY BENEFIT
PLAN FOR 3 YEARS.
1–505.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(1) REVIEW AN INITIAL COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN SUBMITTED BY A
REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION TO ASSESS WHETHER THE PLAN IS ADEQUATE
IN MEETING COMMUNITY NEEDS; AND
(2) MONITOR THE EXTENT TO WHICH A REGULATED FINANCIAL
INSTITUTION HAS ATTAINED THE GOALS OF THE PLAN DURING EACH YEAR THAT THE
PLAN IS IN EFFECT.
(B) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT A COMMUNITY BENEFIT
PLAN IS NOT ADEQUATE IN MEETING COMMUNITY NEEDS OR THAT A REGULATED
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION HAS SUBSTANTIALLY FAILED TO ATTAIN ANNUAL GOALS
UNDER THE PLAN, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(1) DENY AN APPLICATION FOR A DEPOSIT FACILITY OR LICENSE
SUBMITTED BY THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION;
(2) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER § 2–117 OF THIS ARTICLE OR
INCREASE A FEE APPLICABLE TO THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION UNDER
§ 5–203, § 6–712, OR § 11–503.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, WITH THE PROCEEDS PAYABLE
TO THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
2–118.2 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) REQUIRE A BRANCH DIVESTITURE FOR THE REGULATED
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION;

HOUSE BILL 1040
(4) PROHIBIT THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION FROM
SELLING LOANS TO GOVERNMENT–SPONSORED ENTERPRISES; OR
(5) (I) REQUIRE AN ADJUSTMENT TO THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT
PLAN OR ADOPTION OF A REMEDIAL ACTION PLAN THAT SPECIFIES CONCRETE
STEPS TO MEET COMMUNITY NEEDS OR ATTAIN ANNUAL GOALS, SUCH AS
INCREASING MARKETING TO UNDERSERVED OR DISTRESSED COMMUNITIES; AND
(II) MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ANY ADJUSTMENT OR
REMEDIAL ACTION PLAN REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM.
(C) (1) A BANKING INSTITUTION OR A CREDIT UNION SHALL HONOR ANY
COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN ESTABLISHED BY AN ENTITY ACQUIRED BY THE
BANKING INSTITUTION OR CREDIT UNION.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DENY AN APPLICATION FOR A
DEPOSIT FACILITY OF A BANKING INSTITUTION OR CREDIT UNION THAT DOES NOT
COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) IF A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION HAS ENGAGED IN AN UNFAIR,
ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE UNDER § 13–301 OF THE COMMERCIAL
LAW ARTICLE OR AN ACT OR A PRACTICE THAT VIOLATES FAIR LENDING AND
HOUSING LAWS INTENDED TO ENSURE THE FAIR, EQUITABLE, AND
NONDISCRIMINATORY ACCESS TO CREDIT FOR INDIVIDUALS AND COMMUNITIES
THAT ARE ENFORCED BY THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF CONSUMER FINANCIAL
PROTECTION OR OTHER FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCIES, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL
PENALIZE THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION IN A MANNER COMMENSURATE
WITH THE EXTENT OF THE HARM EXPERIENCED BY INDIVIDUALS OR COMMUNITIES
IMPACTED BY THE VIOLATION.
1–506.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ESTABLISH A COMMUNITY BENEFIT REVIEW
COMMITTEE TO REVIEW THE ADEQUACY OF COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLANS ADOPTED
BY REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS.
(B) THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT REVIEW COMMITTEE
SHALL CONSIST OF:
(1) REPRESENTATIVES OF COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS;
(2) LEADERS FROM THE FAITH COMMUNITY;

HOUSE BILL 1040 11
(3) REPRESENTATIVES OF CIVIL RIGHTS ORGANIZATIONS;
(4) ELECTED OR APPOINTED PUBLIC OFFICIALS FROM URBAN AND
RURAL JURISDICTIONS; AND
(5) OTHER STAKEHOLDERS REPRESENTING A DIVERSITY OF
INTERESTS AND PERSPECTIVES RELATING TO AFFORDABLE HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(C) THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT REVIEW COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST
TWICE A YEAR TO:
(1) ASSESS WHETHER ADOPTED COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLANS ARE
ADEQUATE IN MEETING COMMUNITY NEEDS;
(2) REVIEW THE COMMISSIONER’S ENFORCEMENT OF THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING APPLICATIONS FOR A DEPOSIT
FACILITY OR LICENSE THAT HAVE BEEN APPROVED AND DENIED BY THE
COMMISSIONER; AND
(3) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE COMMISSIONER FOR:
(I) IMPROVEMENTS IN THE EFFECTIVENESS OF ENFORCEMENT
AND OF COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLANS IN INCREASING LOANS, INVESTMENTS, AND
SERVICES TO LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME COMMUNITIES AND OTHER
UNDERSERVED OR DISTRESSED COMMUNITIES; AND
(II) THE OPERATION OF THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–118.2 OF THIS ARTICLE AND THE ACTIVITIES
FINANCED BY THE FUND.
1–507.
(A) A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION SHALL PROVIDE A NOTICE TO
THE PUBLIC THAT IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING:
“MARYLAND COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT NOTICE
THE COMMISSIONER OF FINANCIAL REGULATION IN THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR REQUIRES THIS INSTITUTION TO ISSUE A COMMUNITY
BENEFITS PLAN INDICATING HOW THIS INSTITUTION WILL SERVE THE NEEDS OF
LOW–INCOME TO MODERATE–INCOME COMMUNITIES AND OTHER UNDERSERVED OR
DISTRESSED COMMUNITIES. THE COMMISSIONER TAKES THIS PLAN INTO ACCOUNT

HOUSE BILL 1040
WHEN DECIDING ON CERTAIN APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED FOR APPROVAL BY THE
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL REGULATION. YOUR INVOLVEMENT IS ENCOURAGED. YOU
MAY OBTAIN A COPY OF OUR PLAN FROM THIS INSTITUTION OR FROM THE
COMMISSIONER. THE PLAN IS POSTED ON THIS INSTITUTION’S WEBSITE AND YOU
MAY ALSO OBTAIN FROM THIS INSTITUTION A HARD COPY OF THE PLAN. YOU MAY
SUBMIT WRITTEN COMMENTS ABOUT OUR PLAN AND PERFORMANCE IN MEETING
COMMUNITY FINANCIAL SERVICES NEEDS TO THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
REGULATION.”.
(B) THE NOTICE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE
POSTED:
(1) IN THE PUBLIC LOBBY OF A REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION;
AND
(2) ON THE WEBSITE OF THE REGULATED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION.
2–118.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Banking Institution and Credit Union
Regulation Fund established under this section.
(b) There is a Banking Institution and Credit Union Regulation Fund that
consists of:
(1) All revenue received for the chartering and regulation of persons who
engage in the business of a banking institution or credit union under this article; and
(2) Any other fee, assessment, or revenue received by the Commissioner
from banking institutions and credit unions under this article.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commissioner shall [pay]:
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, PAY
all fines and penalties collected by the Commissioner from banking institutions and credit
unions under this article into the General Fund of the State; AND
(2) PAY ANY PENALTIES AND FEES ASSESSED UNDER § 1–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE INTO THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
2–118.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
2–118.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1040 13
(2) “COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–501 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND.
(B) THERE IS A COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FINANCE COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES.
(D) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 1–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
ACTIVITIES.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.

HOUSE BILL 1040
2–120.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Board” means the State Collection Agency Licensing Board established
under Title 7 of the Business Regulation Article.
(3) “Fund” means the Non–Depository Special Fund established under this
section.
(b) There is a Non–Depository Special Fund that consists of:
(1) All revenues received from licensing fees from each licensed person;
(2) All revenues received from registration fees from each registered
person;
(3) All revenues received from annual assessments under subsection (h) of
this section;
(4) Income from the investments that the State Treasurer makes for the
Fund; and
(5) Any other fee, examination or investigation fee or assessment, or
revenue received by the Commissioner or the Board with respect to any regulated person.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section:
(1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE Commissioner and the Board shall pay all fines and penalties collected from any
regulated person into the General Fund of the State; [and]
(2) Revenue received by the Commissioner for use of the Foreclosed
Property Registry established under Title 7 of the Real Property Article shall be paid by
the Commissioner to the Foreclosed Property Registry Fund established under § 7–105.14
of the Real Property Article; AND
(3) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL PAY ANY PENALTIES AND FEES
ASSESSED UNDER § 1–505 OF THIS ARTICLE INTO THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–118.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–203.
(b) The Commissioner shall impose annual assessments on each banking
institution as provided in this section, to cover the expense of regulating banking

HOUSE BILL 1040 15
institutions AND ENFORCE, AS NECESSARY, THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 1,
SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section[, for]:
(1) FOR a banking institution with a composite CAMELS rating of 3, 4, or
5 for its most recent examination, the annual assessment imposed under this section shall
be increased by an additional 25%; AND
(2) THE ANNUAL ASSESSMENT IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
BE INCREASED BY AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER AND PAYABLE
TO THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–118.2 OF THIS
ARTICLE TO ENFORCE THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
6–712.
(c) (1) The Commissioner shall impose an annual assessment on each credit
union as provided in this subsection to cover the expense of regulating credit unions AND
ENFORCE, AS NECESSARY, THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(5) THE COMMISSIONER MAY INCREASE THE ANNUAL ASSESSMENT
BY AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER AND PAYABLE TO THE
COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–118.2 OF THIS
ARTICLE TO ENFORCE THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
11–503.1.
(a) The Commissioner shall set by regulation the fees provided for in this subtitle.
(b) The fees established by the Commissioner under this section together with
any assessments of licensees under this subtitle shall [be]:
(1) BE reasonable and set in a manner that will collectively produce funds
sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory
duties of the Commissioner related to licensees in accordance with this subtitle; AND
(2) PROVIDE FOR AN INCREASE IN THE AMOUNT ASSESSED ON A
MORTGAGE LENDER, AS NECESSARY, TO ENABLE THE COMMISSIONER TO ENFORCE
THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS ARTICLE, WITH THE
PROCEEDS PAYABLE TO THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 2–118.2 OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1040
(c) The Commissioner shall publish the fee schedule set by the Commissioner.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.